Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 1. Contagious and Infectious Diseases.

§ 3.2-6000.
Right of entry.

The State Veterinarian and his representatives are authorized to enter upon any premises for the purpose of performing the duties imposed upon them by this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-573; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-731; 1981, c. 130; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6001.
Protection of livestock and poultry.

The Commissioner, the Board, the State Veterinarian, and all other veterinarians within the Commonwealth shall use their best efforts to protect livestock and poultry from contagious and infectious disease. It shall also be the duty of the Commissioner, the Board, and the State Veterinarian to cooperate with the livestock and poultry disease control officials of other states and with the U.S. Department of Agriculture in establishing interstate quarantine lines and regulations so as to best protect the livestock and poultry of the Commonwealth against all contagious and infectious diseases.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-566; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-724; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6002.
Contagious and infectious diseases; prevention and eradication; presence of biological residues.

The State Veterinarian shall take such measures as may be necessary to prevent the spread of and eradicate contagious and infectious livestock and poultry diseases. The Board may adopt regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this article. The Board and the Commissioner are also authorized to make the regulations adopted under this article conform, insofar as practicable, to those regulations adopted under federal statutes governing animal health.

The Commissioner may adopt by reference any federal regulation adopted pursuant to any federal statute relating to animal health, amending it as necessary for intrastate applicability. Any regulation adopted by the Commissioner pursuant to this subsection shall be effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations, who shall publish the regulation as a final regulation in the Virginia Register of Regulations, or upon a date specified by the Department that is after the filing.The regulation shall contain a preamble stating that the Board will receive, consider and respond to a petition by any interested person at any time with respect to reconsideration or revision of such regulation. Neither the requirements of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) nor public participation guidelines adopted pursuant thereto shall apply to the adoption of any regulation by the Commissioner pursuant to this subsection.

The Board, after giving notice in the Virginia Register of Regulations, may reconsider and revise the regulation adopted by the Commissioner. If, upon reconsideration, the Board determines that the regulation should be revised other than as authorized by subsection B, the Board may amend the regulation only as authorized by the Administrative Process Act.

The Commissioner and the Board may use the powers granted by this article to abate the presence of biological residues in or on livestock or poultry. Biological residues shall mean those substances remaining in or on any animal prior to or at the time of slaughter as the result of treatment or exposure that are determined by the Commissioner and the Board to be or to have the potential for being injurious to the health of humans or animals.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-568; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-726; 1977, c. 299; 1981, c. 130; 1991, c. 294; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to exemptions, generally, from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4002

.

§ 3.2-6003.
Duty of State Veterinarian when animals are suspected of having a contagious or infectious disease.

The State Veterinarian, upon receipt of reliable information of the existence of any contagious or infectious disease among animals of the Commonwealth with potential impact on livestock or poultry, shall immediately make an evaluation that may include going to the place where such disease has been reported. The evaluation may include conducting tests of the animals believed to be affected with such disease, and ascertain, if possible, what, if any, disease exists, and whether the same is contagious or infectious.

Upon notice by the State Veterinarian or his representative, the owner or custodian of any animal to be evaluated shall isolate and confine the animal if necessary to accomplish the evaluation or to prevent the spread of contagious or infectious disease.

If a disease is found to be contagious or infectious, the State Veterinarian, or his representative, may adopt and enforce quarantine lines and regulations and shall enforce such cleaning and disinfection as may be deemed necessary to prevent the spread of such disease. Quarantine lines and regulations, when adopted, shall supersede any similar provisions made by the governing body of any county under the provisions of Chapter 12 (§

15.2-1200

et seq.) of Title 15.2.
C. 1. If a disease is found to be contagious or infectious, the State Veterinarian, or his representative, may adopt and enforce quarantine lines and regulations and shall enforce such cleaning and disinfection as may be deemed necessary to prevent the spread of such disease. Quarantine lines and regulations, when adopted, shall supersede any similar provisions made by the governing body of any county under the provisions of Chapter 12 (§

15.2-1200

et seq.) of Title 15.2.

The State Veterinarian may issue and enforce a proclamation limiting live animal sales and events or the movement of manure, bedding, equipment, vehicles, or other material that may be infectious to prevent the spread of contagious or infectious diseases to livestock and poultry.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-569; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-727; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6004.
Regulation for the separation and caring for diseased animals.

The Board may adopt regulations and the State Veterinarian may give and enforce directions and orders as to separating, feeding, and caring for diseased or exposed animals as necessary to prevent the animals affected with disease, or capable of communicating disease, from coming in contact with livestock or poultry not so affected.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-572; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-730; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6005.
Notice of quarantine.

The State Veterinarian, or his representative, may give such notice as may be necessary to make a quarantine effective.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-574; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-732; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6006.
Quarantine of individuals.

Any individual exposed to contagious or infectious animal diseases that, in the reasonable opinion of the State Veterinarian, may be transmitted by such individual to animals, may be quarantined when, in the reasonable opinion of the State Veterinarian, such quarantine will prevent the spread of such contagious or infectious diseases among livestock or poultry. The provisions of §

32.1-48.010

shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to appeal any order of quarantine issued pursuant to this section. For purposes of this section only, significant health threat shall include threat of contagious or infectious diseases to livestock or poultry.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-571; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-729; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6007.
Domestic animals not permitted to enter or leave quarantine.

Any domestic animal with any contagious or infectious disease, any domestic animal exposed to such a disease, or any domestic animal that is otherwise capable of communicating such a disease to livestock or poultry shall not be permitted to enter or leave any quarantined district, premises, or grounds, except by authority of the State Veterinarian.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-570; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-728; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6008.
Disposition of quarantined animals with potential to impact livestock or poultry.

Disposition of quarantined animals, including condemnation, shall be determined by the State Veterinarian or his representative after confirmation by diagnostic testing, the results of which shall be provided to the owner and grower of such animal upon request.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-576, 3-584, 3-586, 3-598.8; 1956, c. 376; 1966, cc. 5, 702, §§ 3.1-734, 3.1-749, 3.1-751, 3.1-763.2; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6009.
Euthanasia or slaughter of livestock or poultry by owner.

The State Veterinarian may require the owner or custodian to euthanize or slaughter condemned livestock or poultry within a specified period of time, and under state or federal supervision, or under regulations of the Board. The carcasses shall be disposed of pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board.

If the owner or custodian fails to euthanize or slaughter any condemned livestock or poultry pursuant to subsection A, then the State Veterinarian or his representative may seize the condemned livestock or poultry and euthanize or slaughter the animals as required.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-586; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-751; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6010.
Proclamation prohibiting animal importation; required tests.

When the Commissioner or the State Veterinarian shall have a reasonable belief of the existence of contagious or infectious diseases of animals in localities in other states, territories, or countries, or that conditions exist that, in the judgment of the Commissioner or of the State Veterinarian, render the importation of animals from such localities a menace to the health of the livestock or poultry of the Commonwealth, the Commissioner or the State Veterinarian shall, by proclamation, prohibit the importation of any or all kinds of animals from any locality of other states, territories or countries, into the Commonwealth, except pursuant to subsection B.

The Commissioner or the State Veterinarian may require documentation of negative laboratory test results using a test specified by the State Veterinarian within a specific time period prior to an animal, embryo, hatching egg, or semen entering the Commonwealth. Expenses associated with meeting entry requirements shall be borne by the owner of the animal.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-576; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-734; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6011.
Bringing animals infected with disease into the Commonwealth, or in violation of order or regulation; disinfecting transport vehicles.

It shall be unlawful for any person to: (i) transport from outside the Commonwealth into the Commonwealth any animal, knowing the same to be infected with a contagious or infectious disease, or any animal known by the importer to have been exposed to a contagious or infectious disease, or known to bear upon its body ticks or other disease vectors or known to be a carrier of contagious or infectious disease; (ii) import any animal in violation of any legally adopted quarantine or other order or regulation adopted under this article; or (iii) violate any order or regulation adopted under this article to clean and disinfect vehicles used by them for transporting animals into or through the Commonwealth, as may be reasonably necessary to prevent the spread of contagious and infectious diseases of animals within the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-577; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-736; 1977, c. 395; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6012.
Duty of operators of stockyards and poultry slaughter facilities.

Any person who operates a stockyard, poultry slaughter facility, or any other premises where livestock or poultry are repeatedly assembled: (i) shall maintain such premises in a sanitary condition as directed by the State Veterinarian; (ii) shall obey all orders or regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter as to handling livestock or poultry that may be affected with contagious or infectious disease, or that have been exposed to contagious or infectious disease; and (iii) shall clean and disinfect such premises or vehicles used in connection therewith, or any part thereof, when ordered to do so by the State Veterinarian or his representative.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-578; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-737; 1977, c. 395; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6013.
Duty of officers to execute orders of the Commissioner, Board, or State Veterinarian.

The Commissioner, the Board, or the State Veterinarian shall have power to call upon any law-enforcement officer, as defined in §

9.1-101

, to execute their orders. Such officers shall obey the orders of the Commissioner, the Board, or the State Veterinarian.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-579; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-738; 1977, c. 395; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6014.
Circuit court judges may enforce orders of Commissioner, Board, or State Veterinarian.

Upon petition by the Commissioner, the Board, or the State Veterinarian, a circuit court judge may issue orders as are necessary to enforce the orders of the Commissioner, the Board, or State Veterinarian.

History.

1977, c. 395, § 3.1-738.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6015.
Cooperation with U.S. Department of Agriculture to prevent contagious or infectious diseases.

The Governor is authorized to accept, on behalf of the state, the rules and regulations prepared by the U.S. Department of Agriculture under and in pursuance of section three of an act of Congress approved May 29, 1884, entitled “An act for the establishment of a bureau of animal industry, to prevent the exportation of diseased cattle and to provide means for the suppression and extirpation of pleuropneumonia and other contagious diseases among domestic animals,” and to cooperate with the authorities of the United States in the enforcement of the provisions of the act.

The inspectors of the U.S. Department of Agriculture shall have the right of inspection, quarantine, and condemnation of animals affected with any contagious or infectious diseases, or suspected to be so affected, or that have been exposed to any such disease, and for these purposes are authorized and empowered to enter upon any ground or premises. Such inspectors shall have the power to call on sheriffs and peace officers to assist them in the discharge of their duties in carrying out the provisions of the act of Congress aforesaid, and it is made the duty of sheriffs and peace officers to assist such inspectors when so requested, and such inspectors shall have the same powers and protection as peace officers while engaged in the discharge of their duties.

All expenses of quarantine, condemnation of animals exposed to disease, and the expenses of any and all measures that may be used to suppress and extirpate pleuropneumonia shall be paid by the United States, and in no case shall the Commonwealth be liable for any damages or expenses of any kind under the provisions of this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-16; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-739.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6016.
Altering disease control identification of livestock or poultry.

It shall be unlawful for any person to, unless in accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to this article, alter, deface, change from one animal to another, mutilate, substitute, remove, misrepresent, or otherwise interfere with any tag, brand, tattoo, mark, or other identification adopted or used by any county, the Commissioner, the Board, the U.S. Department of Agriculture, or any other state for the identification of any animal in the Commonwealth or shipped into the Commonwealth for the purpose of controlling or eradicating disease.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-591; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-755; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6017.
Unlawful to possess anthrax or non-inactivated classical swine fever virus without permission; report; testing of biologicals for use in livestock or poultry; rules for biologicals.

No person shall buy, sell or have in possession, or administer to livestock, or permit any other to administer to livestock, any product or biological preparation, commonly called vaccine, containing anthrax killed, live, or as a spore, or non-inactivated classical swine fever virus, without permission in writing from the State Veterinarian for each such purchase, sale, or administration. Any person permitted to administer any such product or biological preparation shall remit to the State Veterinarian a report within 10 days of such administration showing the kind, the amount, and the make or brand of the vaccine or virus used, when and from whom purchased, where, when, and by whom administered, including all persons assisting in the administration, together with a description of all animals to which administered, including the breed, age, and sex of each animal.

The State Veterinarian is authorized to examine and test any biological, commonly called vaccine, intended for use in livestock or poultry to determine if it is safe, pure, potent, or effective. The Board is authorized to adopt regulations providing for the limitation, prohibition, or use of any biological intended for use in livestock or poultry.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-592; 1962, c. 11; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-756; 1968, c. 49; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6018.
Repealed by Acts 2016, c. 563, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current penalty provisions, see Article 5 (§

3.2-6043

et seq.) of this title.

Editor’s note.

Former §

3.2-6018

, relating to penalties, was derived from Code 1950, § 3-575; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-733; 1977, c. 395; 1981, c. 130; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6019.
Liability for damages.

Any person who knowingly disregards, violates, or evades any provision of any section of this article, or of Article 2 (§

3.2-6024

et seq.), or any regulation or order of the Commissioner, Board, State Veterinarian, or his representative, shall, in addition to the punishment otherwise provided for, or any other remedy, be liable to the owner thereof, for any damages to his livestock or poultry, occasioned by such disregarding, violating, or evading of any of such provisions, regulations, or orders.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-582; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-740; 2002, c. 185; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6020.
Appraisement of condemned cattle.

All condemned cattle shall be appraised at their fair cash value by three persons, one of whom shall be appointed by the Board or State Veterinarian or his representative, one by the owner, and the third by the two thus selected. Their appraisement shall be made in writing and shall be returned to the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-585; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-750; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6021.
Additional compensation to owners of euthanized or slaughtered animals; liability of purchaser of condemned animal.

In addition to the amount received for the carcasses of animals euthanized or slaughtered, further compensation may be paid to the owners by the Department out of funds appropriated for that purpose at a rate not exceeding that set forth by the U.S. Department of Agriculture, provided that the total amount received by the owner shall not exceed the appraised value of such animal or animals less the amount received for slaughter.

Whenever the owner selling an animal that has been condemned is unable to obtain compensation out of state and federal appropriations because of the failure of the purchaser to furnish the seller with such proof of slaughter as may be required, the purchaser shall, in addition to the agreed purchase price, be liable to the seller for the amounts he would otherwise receive out of state and federal appropriations.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-590; 1954, c. 437; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-754; 1968, c. 49; 1982, c. 284; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6022.
Indemnity to owner for the euthanasia or slaughter of swine.

At such time as the Commonwealth is approved for and becomes eligible to participate in and receive funds from the U.S. Department of Agriculture pursuant to United States Public Law 87-209; 75 Stat. 481 (21 U.S.C.A. §§ 111-113 et seq.), the Commissioner may obtain an appraisal of the fair market value of any swine destroyed pursuant to this article and indemnify the owner thereof for the value of such swine destroyed in an amount equal to the indemnity paid by the U.S. Department of Agriculture, and in no event shall the total indemnity paid by the Commissioner and the U.S. Department of Agriculture exceed the appraised value of such swine. In cases where salvage is received by the owner of the swine, the amount of salvage shall be deducted from the appraised value of the swine in computing the amount of state indemnity.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-598.9; 1966, c. 5, § 3.1-763.3; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6023.
Prevention and control measures; penalty.

The Commissioner may adopt regulations to prevent and control avian influenza in the live-bird marketing system and is authorized to participate in the federal Live Bird Marketing Program of the U.S. Department of Agriculture, as it may be amended from time to time. In adopting such regulations, the Commissioner shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) and from public participation guidelines adopted pursuant thereto. The State Veterinarian and his representatives are authorized and empowered to enter the premises of any entity within the live-bird marketing system to carry out the provisions of any regulations adopted pursuant to this section. Any regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall, unless a later effective date is specified, take effect upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations, who shall publish the regulations as final regulations in the Virginia Register of Regulations, except that no requirement authorized by subsection B that a person be registered or licensed may take effect any sooner than 90 days after the promulgation date of the regulations containing such requirement, the promulgation date being the date of publication in the Virginia Register of Regulations of the final regulations containing such requirement. The regulations shall contain a preamble stating that the Board will receive, consider, and respond to petitions by any interested person at any time with respect to reconsideration or revision of such regulations.

The Commissioner shall establish by regulation a registration or licensing system to regulate the live-bird marketing system in Virginia. As a part of such registration or licensing system, the Commissioner shall register or license all persons who participate in any component of the live-bird marketing system. Such registration or licensing system may include the granting, denial, suspension, or revocation of any registration or license, including governing: (i) the grounds for granting such registration or license; and (ii) the grounds for the denial, suspension, or revocation of such registration or license.

Any person violating any regulation adopted pursuant to this section may be assessed a civil penalty by the Commissioner in an amount not to exceed $2,500 per day per violation. In determining the amount of any civil penalty, the Commissioner shall give due consideration to: (i) the history of the person’s previous violations; (ii) the seriousness of the violation; and (iii) the demonstrated good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance with the regulation after notification of the violation. Civil penalties assessed under this section shall be paid into the Livestock and Poultry Disease Fund established in §

3.2-6045

. The Commissioner shall prescribe procedures for payment of uncontested penalties. The procedure shall include provisions for a person to consent to abatement of the alleged violation and pay a penalty or negotiated sum in lieu of such penalty without admission of civil liability arising from such alleged violation. Final orders may be recorded, enforced, and satisfied as orders or decrees of a circuit court upon certification of such orders by the Commissioner. Such orders may be appealed in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

For the purposes of this section: (i) “live-bird marketing system” includes live-bird markets and the production and distribution units that supply live-bird markets with birds; (ii) “live-bird markets” includes any facility that receives live poultry to be resold or slaughtered and sold onsite, not including any producer or grower that prior to the sale of his own birds slaughters or processes them onsite or at an approved slaughter facility or any producer or grower that sells live birds grown exclusively on his premises and is not a “production unit” or “distribution unit” as defined herein; (iii) “production unit” includes a production facility or farm that is the origin of or participates in the production of poultry offered for sale in a live-bird market; and (iv) “distribution unit” includes a person or business such as a wholesaler, dealer, hauler, and auction market engaged in the transportation or sale of poultry within the live-bird market system.

History.

2006, c. 442, § 3.1-741.6; 2008, c. 860; 2016, c. 563.

Cross references.

As to exemptions, generally, from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4002

.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 563 substituted “the Livestock and Poultry Disease Fund established in §

3.2-6045

” for “a special fund in the state treasury to the credit of the Department to be used in carrying out the purposes of this section or any regulations adopted hereunder” in subsection C.